Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.020

Duties of superintendent of correctional institution.

If the sentence of a person so convicted is not suspended by the court, the superintendent of a major state correctional institution shall receive such person, if committed to his or her institution, and imprison the person until released under the provisions of this chapter, under RCW 9.95.420, upon the completion of the statutory maximum sentence, or through the action of the governor.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 322; 1955 c 133 s 3. Prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.